Tennessee, session 114, SB0730.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-503(a)(7)(A)(i), is amended by
deleting the following language:
A governmental entity shall not require a written request or assess a charge to
view a public record unless otherwise required by law.
and substituting instead:
A governmental entity shall not require a written request or assess a charge to
view a public record unless otherwise required by law or as provided in
subdivision (a)(8).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-503(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(8) A records custodian may require a requestor to pay a fee to view records if
the records requested reasonably require more than one (1) hour of an employee's time
to collect for inspection by the requestor. A records custodian shall not assess a fee for
the first hour an employee works on a request. After the first hour, the records custodian
may charge a fee at an hourly rate that is in proportion to the rate of pay of the employee
who is collecting the records.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0730
002989
- 1 -